North Carolina, session 2025, HB861.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Funds appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health
and Human Services, Division of Public Health, for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
for Carolina Pregnancy Care Fellowship (CPCF), a nonprofit corporation, are subject to the
following requirements:
(1) The CPCF shall establish a competitive grant process for awarding the grants
authorized by subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(3) of Section 9H.11 of S.L.
2023-134. The plan for administering the competitive grant process shall
include all of the following:
a. A request for application (RFA) process to allow pregnancy centers
located in this State to apply for and receive a grant authorized by this
section on a competitive basis. The RFA application shall include at
least all of the following components:
1. An explanation of the applicant's operations and staff,
including all of the following:
I. The hours of operation.
II. The full name, official position, credentials, specialties,
and salaries of all staff and volunteers.
III. Required qualifications, trainings, and credentials for
all employees, volunteers, contractors, and consultants.
IV. An explanation of the application process for
employees, volunteers, and consultants, including
whether the application requires a disclosure about
religious beliefs and if any answer or failure to answer
will disqualify an applicant.
V. What vendors and materials are used for training
employees, consultants, and volunteers.
VI. Whether licensed health care providers are required to
be on-site during operating hours and, if so, an
*H861-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
explanation of the requirement and what arrangements
are made if the requirement cannot be met.
VII. Whether any employees, contractors, or volunteers are
unlicensed health care providers.
VIII. Whether ultrasounds are performed on-site and, if so,
the qualifications of those performing and interpreting
the ultrasounds.
IX. Whether testing for sexually transmitted diseases is
performed on-site and, if so, the names and
qualifications of those performing such testing.
2. The specific activities, services, and programs provided by the
applicant during any part of the year.
3. A description of all medical equipment, the purposes of the
equipment, and funding sources for all of the equipment.
4. An explanation of the applicant's best practices with respect to
the use of medical equipment and the provision of any medical
testing, medical procedures, or counseling services.
5. A description of the applicant's advertising and marketing
practices.
b. A plan to evaluate the effectiveness, including measurable impact or
outcomes, of the activities, services, and programs for which the grant
funds are being requested.
c. A plan to monitor compliance with applicable law and the grant
agreement, with respect to the grantee's expenditure of grant funds.
d. A plan to detect fraud and abuse by grantees.
(2) No later than July 1 of each year, beginning July 1, 2026, the CPCF shall
announce the recipients of the competitive grant awards and allocate funds to
the grantees for the respective grant period pursuant to the amounts designated
under subsection (a) of this section. After awards have been granted, the CPCF
shall submit a report to the Department of Health and Human Services, the
Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the
Fiscal Research Division on the grant awards that includes at least all of the
following information:
a. The identity and a brief description of each grantee and each activity,
service, and program offered by the grantee.
b. The amount of funding awarded to each grantee.
c. The number of persons served by each grantee, broken down by
activity, service, and program.
d. The number of persons served by the Circle of Care Program.
e. A copy of each grantee's RFA application.
(3) The CPCF may not use more than ten percent (10%) of the total amount of
funds allocated by this section for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and not more
than fifteen percent (15%) of the total amount of funds allocated by this
section for subsequent fiscal years for administrative purposes.
(4) Funds allocated to CPCF shall be used for nonsectarian, nonreligious purposes
only.
(5) Annually on July 1, beginning July 1, 2026, the CPCF shall report to the
Department of Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Commission
on Governmental Operations, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the use of
Page 2 House Bill 861-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
funds allocated under this section. The report shall include at least all of the
following information for the preceding fiscal year:
a. A description of any monitoring activities undertaken by the CPCF to
ensure that grant funds awarded under the competitive grant process
authorized by this section are being spent for the purposes for which
they were requested.
b. A description of any technical assistance provided by the CPCF to
grant applicants or grantees.
c. A detailed breakdown of the funds expended by the CPCF for
administrative purposes related to the competitive grant process
authorized by this section.
(6) Annually on July 1, beginning July 1, 2026, each pregnancy center awarded
grant funds pursuant to the competitive grant process authorized by this
section shall report to the Department of Health and Human Services, the Joint
Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research
Division on its use of the grant funds. The report shall include at least all of
the following information for the preceding fiscal year:
a. A report of its activities and services, broken down by funding source,
that includes the number of clients served by each pregnancy center
by county of residence and the following age categories:
1. Less than 16 years old.
2. 16 years old through 20 years old.
3. 21 years old through 25 years old.
4. 26 years old through 30 years old.
5. 31 years old through 35 years old.
6. 36 years old through 40 years old.
7. 41 years old through 45 years old.
8. 46 years old and older.
b. The number of visits by client for each of the previously defined age
categories, broken down by type of visit.
c. The number of services, supports, and referrals provided to clients for
each of the previously defined age categories, broken down by type of
service, support, or referral provided, including pregnancy counseling,
pregnancy testing, ultrasounds, and testing for sexually transmitted
diseases.
d. The number of service requests received by the pregnancy center.
e. The race and ethnicity data associated with clients receiving services.
f. The number of clients that fall under each of the following income
ranges:
1. Less than $20,000.
2. $20,000 to $34,999.
3. $35,000 to $49,999.
4. $50,000 to $74,999.
5. $75,000 to $99,999.
6. Over $100,000.
g. The total number of unduplicated clients served by the pregnancy
center and the total number of unduplicated new clients served during
the fiscal year.
SECTION 2. Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
House Bill 861-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 131E-269.5. Pregnancy centers; performance standards; recovery of State funds for
noncompliance.
(a) As used in this section, the term "pregnancy center" means any nonprofit organization
other than a hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, or clinic that performs abortions, that holds
itself out as a facility that provides care for pregnant women, including pregnancy counseling
services, pregnancy testing, and other nonmedical pregnancy services.
(b) The Department shall adopt rules establishing performance standards for pregnancy
centers operating in this State. The rules shall, at a minimum, establish a monitoring mechanism
and reporting requirements to facilitate the Department periodically assessing whether pregnancy
centers are adhering to the established performance standards. The reporting requirements shall,
at a minimum, require pregnancy centers to annually report to the Department at least all of the
following information for the preceding five-year period:
(1) All contracts and agreements entered into with the State of North Carolina or
Carolina Pregnancy Care Fellowship (CPCF), a nonprofit organization, during
the preceding five-year period.
(2) A list of all monetary transactions between the pregnancy center and State of
North Carolina or CPCF.
(3) Itemized annual expenditures for all of the following:
a. Individual employees, with a breakdown of the number of full-time
and part-time staff, the number of hours worked by each full-time and
part-time staff member, and the salaries and wages paid to each staff
member.
b. Administrative supplies and materials, with an explanation of the
purposes for these items.
c. All supplies and materials provided to individuals served by the
pregnancy center, including:
1. Pregnancy tests.
2. Diapers.
3. Medicines.
4. Baby food.
5. Baby formula.
d. Marketing and promotional materials, including all of the following:
1. Flyers.
2. Print advertisements.
3. Broadcast advertisements.
4. Digital and social media advertisements.
5. Promotions for fundraisers.
e. Educational materials for clients or patients, including pamphlets and
audiovisual seminars.
f. Travel expenses.
g. Medical equipment, including ultrasound machines.
h. Events sponsored by the pregnancy center.
i. Medical training and medical equipment training offered by the
pregnancy center.
j. Contracted services, including staffing services, event services,
information technology services, and cleaning services.
k. Rent or mortgage and utilities.
(4) Documentation of applications for employment and applications for
volunteers.
(5) Copies of Internal Revenue Service Form 990.
Page 4 House Bill 861-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The Department shall take appropriate administrative action to recover any amount
of grant funds or State appropriations disbursed to a pregnancy center for any fiscal year in which
the Department determines that the pregnancy center is out of compliance with the performance
standards adopted under this section. A pregnancy center aggrieved by a final determination of
the Department pursuant to this subsection may appeal the decision as provided under Article 3
of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 861-First Edition Page 5